Illinois, session 104th, HB1436.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Housing Development Act is amended 5by adding Section 7.34 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 3805/7.34 new)7    Sec. 7.34. Housing Hardship Program.8    (a) The Authority shall establish and administer a Housing 9Hardship Program. The Authority shall use moneys in the 10Housing Hardship Program Fund, and any other funds 11appropriated for this purpose, to provide up to 3 months of 12emergency rental or mortgage assistance or up to $1,600 per 13month for 3 months, whichever is less, to eligible applicants 14who demonstrate a hardship or other extenuating circumstances 15that place them at risk of eviction or foreclosure. To be 16eligible for assistance, an applicant must demonstrate one of 17the following hardships or extenuating circumstances:18        (1) Recent divorce.19        (2) Loss of employment.20        (3) Loss of income.21        (4) Incurred funeral expenses following the unexpected 22    death of a spouse or dependent.23        (5) Short-term disability.  HB1436- 2 -LRB104 03016 KTG 13034 b1        (6) Taking unpaid medical leave to care for self, 2    spouse, dependent, or aging family member.3        (7) Medical expenses for the applicant, spouse, or 4    dependent that resulted in substantial debt.5    (b) Applicants may apply for assistance under the program 6once every 2 years regardless of household income. When 7applying for assistance, an applicant must submit a financial 8affidavit supported by banking statements and other 9documentary evidence as prescribed by the Authority. An 10applicant shall not be eligible for assistance under the 11program if the applicant's banking statements or other 12documentary evidence indicates a large withdrawal of funds, as 13determined by the Authority, from the applicant's checking or 14savings account prior to the applicant submitting an 15application for assistance. The Authority shall provide 16assistance to eligible applicants based upon the following 17factors in order of priority:18        (1) Whether the applicant has never previously 19    received housing or public assistance from any other State 20    or federal program.21        (2) If the applicant has previously received housing 22    or public assistance from any other State or federal 23    program, the number of times the applicant received such 24    assistance. 25        (3) The severity of the applicant's declared hardship 26    or circumstances.   HB1436- 3 -LRB104 03016 KTG 13034 b1    (c) The Housing Hardship Program Fund is created as a 2special fund in the State treasury. The Fund shall consist of 3any moneys appropriated for the Housing Hardship Program and 4all interest earned on moneys in the Fund. Subject to 5appropriation, moneys in the Fund shall be used by the 6Authority to provide emergency rental and mortgage assistance 7under the Housing Hardship Program and for no other purpose.  8    Section 10. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 9Section 5.1030 as follows: 10    (30 ILCS 105/5.1030 new)11    Sec. 5.1030. Housing Hardship Program Fund.